Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB715.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5199YC (2) 91 sb/js H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 466D.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âCabinâ means a structure used to provide temporary 3 sleeping quarters for campers. 4 2. âCamperâ means a minor who is attending a youth camp on 5 a day care or boarding basis. 6 3. âCampgroundâ means a commercial property designed 7 to provide cabins for transient overnight guest use or a 8 recreational vehicle park. 9 4. âDepartmentâ means the department of natural resources. 10 5. âFloodplainâ means the same as âfloodplainsâ as defined 11 in section 455B.261. 12 6. âRecreational vehicle parkâ means a commercial property 13 that is designed primarily for recreational vehicle transient 14 guest use and for which fees for site service connections for 15 recreational vehicles are paid daily, weekly, or monthly. 16 7. âYouth campâ means a facility or property that meets all 17 of the following criteria: 18 a. Has the general characteristics of a day camp, resident 19 camp, or travel camp. 20 b. Is used primarily or partially for recreational, 21 athletic, religious, or educational activities. 22 c. Accommodates at least five minors who attend or 23 temporarily reside at the camp for all or part of at least four 24 days. 25 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 466D.2 Youth camps. 26 The department shall adopt rules establishing limits on all 27 of the following in relation to the flood risk at youth camps: 28 1. The number of campers allowed at a youth camp located in 29 a floodplain at any one time. 30 2. The number of cabins allowed on the premises of a youth 31 camp. 32 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 466D.3 Campgrounds ââ emergency 33 systems. 34 1. A campground operating in the state of Iowa shall have 35 -1- LSB 5199YC (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 2 H.F. _____ an emergency alarm system installed and operating within the 1 campground that can function without an internet connection. 2 2. A campground operating in the state of Iowa shall post 3 emergency evacuation directions in all structures within the 4 campground. 5 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 466D.4 Delegation of authority. 6 The department shall have the power and authority reasonably 7 necessary to effectuate this chapter. 8